Wisconsin, session 2025, SB879.
do enact as follows:SB879,11Section 1. 100.77 of the statutes is created to read:SB879,3,11100.77 Proxy advisory services. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB879,3,62(a) “Company” means a publicly traded, for-profit corporation, limited liability 3company, partnership, or other business entity that has its principal place of 4business in this state and that is either organized under the laws of this state or is 5a foreign entity that has made a company proposal to become a domestic entity, 6whether by merger, conversion, interest exchange, or domestication.SB879,3,117(b) “Company proposal” means any proposal made by a company to its 8shareholders that is included in the company’s proxy statement, including a 9proposal relating to director nominations or elections, executive compensation, 10corporate transactions, corporate structure, auditor selection, or company policy on 11any subject.SB879,3,1412(c) “Default recommendation or policy” means a system, set of rules, 13principles, or guidelines designed to assist with voting decisions on any company 14proposals or proxy proposals.SB879,3,1715(d) “Proxy advisor” means a person who, for compensation, provides a proxy 16advisory service to shareholders of a company or to other persons with authority to 17vote on behalf of shareholders of a company.SB879,3,2018(e) “Proxy advisory service” means any of the following services that are 19provided in connection with or in relation to a company or are provided to any 20person in this state:SB879,3,22211. Advice or a recommendation on how to vote on a company proposal or proxy 22proposal.SB879,3,24232. Proxy statement research and analysis regarding a company proposal or 24proxy proposal.SB879,4,213. Development of proxy voting recommendations or policies, including 2establishing default recommendations or policies.SB879,4,53(f) “Proxy proposal” means any proposal made by a shareholder of a company 4that is included in the company’s proxy statement, including a proposal relating to 5any of the subjects that could be covered by a company proposal.SB879,4,76(g) “Shareholder” includes a shareholder, unit holder, limited partner, or other 7equity owner of a company.SB879,4,98(h) “Written financial analysis” means a written document that does all of the 9following:SB879,4,11101. Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and 11costs to a company of implementing a company proposal or proxy proposal.SB879,4,13122. Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect 13shareholder value.SB879,4,16143. Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis, including 15the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the 16recommendation.SB879,4,2217(2) Recommendation not based on written financial analysis. If a proxy 18advisor makes a recommendation against company management on a company 19proposal or proxy proposal, or provides a default recommendation or policy 20involving votes against company management on a company proposal or proxy 21proposal, and the proxy advisor does not do so based on a written financial analysis, 22the proxy advisor shall do all of the following:SB879,5,223(a) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include a clear 1and conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder, or person acting on behalf of a 2shareholder, receiving the proxy advisory service that does all of the following:SB879,5,331. Identifies the proxy advisory service being provided.SB879,5,442. Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue.SB879,5,753. States that the proxy advisor has made the recommendation or policy 6without doing so based on a written financial analysis regarding the effect of that 7recommended action or policy on company investors that does all of the following:SB879,5,98a. Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and 9costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal.SB879,5,1110b. Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect 11shareholder value.SB879,5,1412c. Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis, including 13the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the 14recommendation.SB879,5,1815(b) For any proxy advisory service described in sub. (1) (e) 1. or 2., 16concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, provide the disclosure 17under par. (a) to the board of directors of the company that is the subject of the 18proxy advisory service.SB879,5,2419(c) While the proxy advisory service is being provided, publicly and 20conspicuously disclose on the home or front page of the proxy advisor’s website that 21the proxy advisor’s proxy advisory services include recommendations or policies 22against company management on company proposals or proxy proposals that are 23not made based on a written financial analysis regarding the effect of that 24recommended action or policy on company investors that does all of the following:SB879,6,211. Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and 2costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal.SB879,6,432. Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively affect 4shareholder value.SB879,6,753. Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis, including 6the experience and geographic location of the personnel who formed the 7recommendation.SB879,6,138(3) Recommendation based on written financial analysis. If a proxy 9advisor makes a recommendation against company management on a company 10proposal or proxy proposal, or provides a default recommendation or policy 11involving votes against company management on a company proposal or proxy 12proposal, and the proxy advisor does so based on a written financial analysis, the 13proxy advisor shall do all of the following:SB879,6,1614(a) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include a clear 15and conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder, or person acting on behalf of a 16shareholder, receiving the proxy advisory service that does all of the following:SB879,6,17171. Identifies the proxy advisory service being provided.SB879,6,18182. Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue.SB879,6,21193. States that the proxy advisor has made the recommendation or policy based 20on a written financial analysis regarding the effect of that recommended action or 21policy on company investors that does all of the following:SB879,6,2322a. Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and 23costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb879 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb879 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB879 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB879 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB879: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting